Hawaii, session 2025, SB537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State did not reach mandates established in 1991 to reduce the solid waste stream by fifty per cent by 2000.  The legislature also finds that the Aloha+ Challenge established the goal to reduce by seventy per cent the solid waste stream prior to disposal by 2030 through source reduction, recycling, bioconversion, and landfill diversion methods for organic waste. To meet United Nations Sustainable Development and Aloha+ Challenge goals related to waste reduction, there is a need to embed in statute existing goals and further benchmarks to track and require progress toward reducing solid waste production and increasing organic waste diversion. SECTION 2. Chapter 342G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342G-    Benchmarks.  It is the goal of the State to reduce the solid waste stream prior to disposal by requiring organic waste generators to divert material to any certified facility within twenty miles by: (1)  January 1, 2027:  (Tier 1) All wholesale food vendors, food service providers, food distributors, grocery stores greater than ten thousand square feet, supermarkets, hotels, and any entity generating one ton per week or one hundred four tons per year or more; (2)  January 1, 2032:  (Tier 2) All restaurants, local education agencies, large venues and event spaces, state agencies, health facilities, and any entity generating one half ton per week or twenty-six tons per year or more; (3)  January 1, 2036:  Any multifamily complexes and any entity generating one third ton per week or eighteen tons per year or more; and (4)  January 1, 2037:  Organic wastes shall be banned from landfills and co-generation plants, including that produced by single family residences." SECTION 3. Section 342G-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Biodegradable" means capable of being broken down or decomposed into carbon dioxide, methane or simpler organic compounds by bacteria or other living organisms. "Organic waste" means any material that is compostable or biodegradable and is derived from either a plant or an animal, and includes green waste, food waste, food-soiled paper that is acceptable for food storage, and untreated and unpainted wood waste." SECTION 4. Section 342G-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§342G-3[]] Goals.  (a)  It is the goal of the State to reduce the solid waste stream prior to disposal by: (1)  [Twenty-five] Forty per cent by January 1, [1995;] 2027; and (2)  [Fifty] Seventy per cent by January 1, [2000;] 2032; through source reduction, recycling, organic waste landfill diversion, and bioconversion.  Where feasible, the office shall establish other state goals for specific commodities, recognizing market considerations. (b) It is the goal of the State to reduce [by not less than twenty-five per cent the amount of office paper generated by all state and county agencies by January 1, 1995, through source reduction. The base year for calculating progress toward this goal shall be total office paper consumption by state and county agencies in 1990.] organic waste stream disposal via incineration, waste-to-energy, or landfill by: (1)  Forty per cent by January 1, 2027; (2)  Seventy per cent by January 1, 2032; and (3)  One hundred per cent by January 1, 2037. (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a county from setting waste reduction goals higher than those of the State." SECTION 5. Section 342G-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) The recycling [and], bioconversion, and organic waste diversion component shall identify and assess: (1)  The level of waste reduction the county is achieving through existing recycling and bioconversion efforts; (2)  The type and amount of solid waste that it is technically and economically feasible to recycle or alter through bioconversion; [and] (3)  Methods to increase and improve the recycling and bioconversion efforts, including opportunities for backyard composting[.]; and (4)  Diversion of all organic waste produced within the county by facilities generating more than a minimum amount, as established in section 342G-  . For recycling, the counties shall assess the type and amount of solid waste that it is technically feasible to recycle, giving consideration at a minimum to clear glass, colored glass, aluminum, steel and bimetallic cans, high-grade office paper, newsprint, mixed paper, corrugated paper, HDPE, PET, and green waste. For bioconversion, the counties shall assess the type and amount of solid waste that it is technically feasible to alter through bioconversion, giving consideration at a minimum to green waste, wood waste, animal manure, sewage sludge, and food wastes." SECTION 6. Each county shall incorporate the new requirement established by section 4 of this Act into its next integrated solid waste management plan revision for submission to the office of solid waste management pursuant to section 342G-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of health to reimburse the counties for incorporation of the new requirements under this Act into their respective integrated solid waste management plan revisions as required by this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________